North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-51 Oil and Gas Gross Production Tax

57-51-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Barrel of oil” means forty-two United States gallons of two hundred thirty-one cubic inches per gallon computed at a temperature of sixty degrees Fahrenheit [158.99 liters computed at a temperature of 15.56 degrees Celsius].

“Commissioner” means the state tax commissioner.

“Field” means the geographic area underlaid by one or more pools, as defined by the industrial commission.

“Gas” means natural gas and casinghead gas.

“Hub city” means a city with a population of twelve thousand five hundred or more, according to the last official decennial federal census, which is located in a county that has oil and gas gross production tax or oil extraction tax revenue collections attributed to it, as reported by the tax commissioner in certifications made to the state treasurer, in any three consecutive months during the twenty-four month period preceding September first of the most recent odd-numbered year.

“Hub city school district” means the school district with the highest student enrollment within the city limits of a hub city.

“Oil” means petroleum, crude oil, mineral oil, and casinghead gasoline.

“Person” includes partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, fiduciary, trustee, and any combination of individuals.

“Posted price” means the price specified in publicly available posted price bulletins or other public notices, net of any adjustments for quality and location.

“Shallow gas” means gas produced from a gas well completed in or producing from a shallow gas zone, as certified to the tax commissioner by the industrial commission.

“Shallow gas zone” means a strata or formation, including lignite or coal strata or seam, located above the depth of five thousand feet [1524 meters] below the surface, or located more than five thousand feet [1524 meters] below the surface but above the top of the Rierdon formation, from which gas is or may be produced.

“Transportation costs” means the costs incurred for transporting oil established in accordance with the first applicable of the following methods:

Actual costs incurred under the arm’s-length contract between the producer and the transporter of oil.

An applicable common carrier rate established and filed with the North Dakota public service commission, or the appropriate federal jurisdictional agency.

When no common carrier rate would be applicable, the transportation costs are those reasonable costs associated with the actual operating and maintenance expenses, overhead costs directly attributable and allocable to the operation and maintenance, and either depreciation and a return on undepreciated capital investment, or a cost equal to a return on the investment in the transportation system, as determined by the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5101; S.L. 1983, ch. 648, § 14; 1991, ch. 689, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2003, ch. 542, § 1; 2007, ch. 541, § 1; 2013, ch. 471, § 1; 2015, ch. 463, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 38, § 15, eff for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2017; 2019, ch. 504, § 2, effective for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2019.

57-51-02.
Gross production tax — Oil.

A tax of five percent of the gross value at the well is levied upon all oil produced within North Dakota, less the value of any part thereof, the ownership or right to which is exempt from taxation. The tax levied attaches to the whole production, including the royalty interest.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 2; 1957, ch. 368, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5102; S.L. 1991, ch. 689, § 2.

57-51-02.1.
Type of tax.

For purposes of interpreting chapter 785 of the 1987 Session Laws, relating to federal land bank taxation and to the taxation of other governmental entities if their immunity from taxation has been waived, the gross production tax is a real property tax on oil-producing and gas-producing mineral estates and interests.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 731, § 1.

57-51-02.2.
Gross production tax — Gas.

A gross production tax is levied upon all gas produced within North Dakota except gas that is exempt from taxation. The tax levied must attach to the whole production, including the royalty interest. The tax on gas must be calculated by taking the taxable production in mcf times the gas tax rate.

The gas tax rate is four cents times the gas base rate adjustment for each fiscal year as calculated under subsection 2.

The tax department shall annually determine the gas base rate adjustment and the resulting gas tax rate for each fiscal year beginning on July first.

The gas base rate adjustment for the fiscal year is a fraction, the numerator of which is the annual average of the gas fuels producer price index, commodity code 05-3, as calculated and published by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the previous calendar year, and the denominator of which is seventy-five and seven-tenths.

The tax department shall provide the gas base rate adjustment and the gas tax rate for the fiscal year, as determined under this subsection, to affected producers by written notice mailed on or before June first.

If the index used to determine the gas base rate adjustment is substantially revised, or if the base year for the index is changed, the department by administrative rule shall make appropriate adjustment to the method used to determine the gas base rate adjustment to ensure a result which is reasonably consistent with the result which would have been obtained had the index not been revised or the base year changed.

If the gas fuels producer price index is discontinued, a comparable index must be adopted by the department by an administrative rule.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 689, § 3; 2001, ch. 549, § 1; 2003, ch. 524, § 7.

57-51-02.3.
Valuation of oil — Alternatives — Exceptions.

The gross value at the well for oil is the price paid for the oil under an arm’s-length contract between the producer and the purchaser less, when applicable, transportation costs associated with moving the oil from the point of production to the point of sale under the contract. In the absence of an arm’s-length contract, the gross value at the well for oil is established by the first applicable of the following methods:

The price paid under an arm’s-length contract, to which the person paying the tax is a party, for the purchase or sale of oil of like kind, character, and quality, in the same field or, if none, in a nearby field, less, when applicable, transportation costs associated with moving the oil from the point of production to the point of sale.

The price paid under an arm’s-length contract, between parties other than the person paying the tax, for the purchase or sale of oil of like kind, character, and quality, in the same field or, if none, in a nearby field, less, when applicable, transportation costs associated with moving the oil from the point of production to the point of sale.

The value determined by consideration of the posted price relevant in valuing oil of like kind, character, and quality, in the same field or, if none, in a nearby field, less, when applicable, adjustments for transportation costs to reflect the differential between the value at the point of production and the value at the location reflected in the posted price.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 689, § 4.

57-51-02.4.
Shallow gas — Gross production tax exemption.

Shallow gas produced during the first twenty-four months of production from and after the date of first sales of gas from a well completed or recompleted in a shallow gas zone after June 30, 2003, is exempted from the gross production tax levied under section 57-51-02.2. Gas produced from such a well during testing prior to well completion or connection to a pipeline is also exempt from the gross production tax.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 542, § 2; 2007, ch. 541, § 2.

57-51-02.5.
Exemption of gas for electrical generation at well site.

Gas burned at the well site to power an electrical generator that consumes at least seventy-five percent of the gas from the well is exempt from the tax under section 57-51-02.2.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 574, § 3.

57-51-02.6.
Temporary exemption for oil and gas wells employing a system to avoid flaring.

Gas is exempt from the tax under section 57-51-02.2 for a period of two years and thirty days from the time of first production if the gas is:

Collected and used at the well site to power an electrical generator that consumes at least seventy-five percent of the gas from the well; or

Collected at the well site by a system that intakes at least seventy-five percent of the gas and natural gas liquids volume from the well for beneficial consumption by means of compression to liquid for use as fuel, transport to a processing facility, production of petrochemicals or fertilizer, conversion to liquid fuels, separating and collecting over fifty percent of the propane and heavier hydrocarbons, or other value-added processes as approved by the industrial commission.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 472, § 3.

57-51-03.
Gross production tax to be in lieu of other taxes.

The payment of the taxes herein imposed must be in full, and in lieu of all ad valorem taxes by the state, counties, cities, towns, townships, school districts, and other municipalities, upon any property rights attached to or inherent in the right to producing oil or gas, upon producing oil or gas leases, upon machinery, appliances, and equipment used in and around any well producing oil or gas and actually used in the operation of such well, and also upon oil and gas produced in the state upon which gross production taxes have been paid, and upon any investment in any such property. Any interest in the land, other than that herein enumerated, must be assessed and taxed as other property within the taxing district in which such property is situated. It is expressly provided that the gross production tax is not in lieu of income taxes nor excise taxes upon the sale of oil and gas products at retail.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5103.

57-51-04.
Equipment used in production exempt from ad valorem tax.

No equipment, material, or property is exempt from the payment of ad valorem tax by reason of the payment of the gross production tax as herein provided except such equipment, machinery, tools, material, or property as is actually necessary and being used at the site of a producing well in the production of oil or gas; and it is expressly declared that no ice plants, hospitals, office buildings, garages, residences, gasoline extraction or absorption plants, water systems, fuel systems, roominghouses, and other buildings, nor any equipment or material used in connection therewith is exempt from ad valorem tax, nor are drilling rigs exempt. The real property is not exempt under this chapter except to the extent of the mineral interests therein.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5104.

57-51-05.
Payment of tax on monthly basis — When tax due — When delinquent — Payment by purchaser — By producer — How casinghead gas taxed.

The gross production tax on oil or gas, as herein provided, must be paid on a monthly basis. The tax on oil is due and payable on the twenty-fifth day of the month succeeding the month of production. The tax on gas is due and payable on the fifteenth day of the second month succeeding the month of production. If the tax is not paid as required by this section, it becomes delinquent and must be collected as provided in this chapter. The penalty does not apply if ninety percent of the tax due has been paid with the monthly return and the taxpayer files an amended monthly return and pays the total tax due within sixty days from the original due date. The commissioner, upon request and a proper showing of the necessity therefor, may grant an extension of time, not to exceed fifteen days, for paying the tax and when the request is granted the tax is not delinquent until the extended period has expired. Any taxpayer who requests and is granted an extension of time for filing a return shall pay, with the tax, interest at the rate of twelve percent per annum from the date the tax was due to the date the tax is paid.

On oil or gas produced and sold, the gross production tax thereon must be paid by the purchaser, and the purchaser is authorized to deduct in making settlement with the producer or royalty owner, the amount of tax paid; provided, that in the event oil produced is not sold but is retained by the producer, the tax on the oil not sold must be paid by the producer, including the tax due on royalty oil not sold; provided further, that in settlement with the royalty owner the producer has the right to deduct the amount of the tax paid on royalty oil or to deduct therefrom royalty oil equivalent in value at the time the tax becomes due with the amount of the tax paid.

Gas when produced and utilized in any manner, except when used for fuel or otherwise used in the operation of any lease or premises in the drilling for or production of oil or gas therefrom, or for repressuring thereon, must be considered for the purpose of this chapter, as to the amount utilized, as gas actually produced and saved.

All calculations of the gross production tax on oil or gas, including production, distribution, and claims for credit or refund, are based on the month of production and must be credited to that month.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5105; S.L. 1965, ch. 440, § 1; 1983, ch. 648, § 6; 1989, ch. 732, § 1; 1991, ch. 689, § 5; 1999, ch. 530, § 2; 2001, ch. 549, § 2; 2005, ch. 585, § 1.

57-51-05.1.
Reclamation of oil — Refiner to pay tax — Reports required.

On all oil reclaimed from tank bottoms, pit oil, and saltwater, the gross production tax shall be paid by the operator of the reclaiming plant, unless taxes have already been paid thereon. If tank bottom or pit oil material is removed from the lease by the operator of a treatment plant, the gross value of oil reclaimed from the material is the purchase price paid by the operator of the treatment plant for the material from which the oil is reclaimed. If the operator has not paid a cash price for the material, the oil reclaimed has no value at the well. Every person, firm, association, corporation, or limited liability company engaged in the sale, purchasing, and refining of tank bottoms, pit oil, and saltwater shall report to the commissioner, upon forms prescribed by the commissioner, information necessary to the enforcement of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 660, § 1; 1985, ch. 649, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106.

57-51-06.
Tax paid to commissioner — Statements by person paying tax — Statements by producer.

The tax herein provided for must be paid to the commissioner and the person paying the tax shall file with the commissioner at the time the tax is required to be paid a statement on forms prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner may require a purchaser to file the statement or report by electronic data interchange or other electronic media.

Any person engaged in the production, within this state, of oil shall on or before the twenty-fifth day of the next succeeding month after production, and any person engaged in the production of gas within this state shall, on or before the fifteenth of the second succeeding month after production, file with the commissioner a statement upon forms prescribed by the commissioner. The commissioner may waive the requirement that a producer file a well production report. A waiver by the commissioner of the requirement to file a well production report does not release the producer from any obligation to remit the tax under this chapter. A waiver does not release the producer from any duty or obligation under section 57-51-07 to maintain production records for inspection by the commissioner.

Reports from either the purchaser or producer, as the case may be, are delinquent after the last day fixed for their filing, and every person required to file a report is subject to a penalty of twenty-five dollars per day for each property upon which the person fails or refuses to file the reports. The penalties herein prescribed are for failure to file reports and are in addition to the penalty imposed by section 57-51-10 and likewise constitute a lien against the assets of the person failing or refusing to file the reports. The penalties prescribed under this section must be collected in the same manner as gross production taxes and must be apportioned as other gross production tax penalties; provided, that the commissioner may, for good cause shown, waive any penalties imposed under this section. When royalty is claimed to be exempt from taxation by law, the facts on which the claims of exemption are based and other relevant information must be furnished when requested by the commissioner.

The tax commissioner may prescribe alternative methods for signing, subscribing, or verifying a return filed by electronic means, including telecommunications, that shall have the same validity and consequence as the actual signature and written declaration for a paper return.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 6; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5106; S.L. 1965, ch. 440, § 2; 1983, ch. 648, § 7; 1989, ch. 732, § 2; 1991, ch. 689, § 6; 1997, ch. 54, § 8; 1997, ch. 501, § 1; 2003, ch. 524, § 8.

57-51-07.
Powers of commissioner.

The commissioner has power to require any person engaged in such production and the agent or employee of such person, or purchaser of such oil or gas, or the owner of any royalty interest therein to furnish any additional information the commissioner deems to be necessary for the purpose of correctly computing the amount of said tax, and to examine the books, records, and files of such person, and has power to conduct hearings and compel the attendance of witnesses, the production of books, records, and papers of any person, and full authority to make any investigation or hold any inquest deemed necessary to a full and complete disclosure of the true facts as to the amount of production from any oil or gas location, or of any company or other producer thereof, and as to the rendition thereof for taxing purposes.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 7; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5107.

57-51-08.
State board of equalization may adjust rate of gross production tax to equal the general ad valorem tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 611, § 2.

57-51-09.
Commissioner shall compute tax on incorrect returns.

The commissioner may ascertain and determine whether a return required to be filed with the commissioner is a true and correct return of the gross products, and of the value thereof, of that person. If any person has made an untrue or incorrect return of the gross production or value thereof, as hereinbefore required, or has failed or refused to make a return, the commissioner shall under rules adopted by the commissioner, ascertain the correct amount of either, and compute the tax.

The time to assess additional tax found due is three years after the due date of the original return or three years after the original return is filed, whichever period expires later. However, if there is a change in tax liability on any return by an amount in excess of twenty-five percent of the amount of tax liability reported on a return, any additional tax determined to be due may be assessed anytime within six years after the due date of the return or six years after the return was filed, whichever period expired later.

If a taxpayer files an amended return, the tax commissioner has two years after the return is filed to audit the return and assess any additional tax attributable to the changes or corrections even though other time periods prescribed in this section for the assessment of tax may have expired. The provisions of this section do not limit or restrict any other time period prescribed in this section for the assessment of tax that has not expired as of the end of the two-year period prescribed in this section.

For periods in which the tax commissioner has waived the requirement that a producer file a well production report required under section 57-51-06, the tax commissioner has three years after the due date of the purchaser’s return or three years after the purchaser’s return is filed, whichever period expires later, to assess the producer for additional tax found due. However, if there is a change in tax liability on the purchaser’s return by an amount in excess of twenty-five percent of the amount of tax liability reported on a purchaser’s return, any additional tax determined to be due may be assessed from the producer anytime within six years after the due date of the purchaser’s return or six years after the purchaser’s return was filed, whichever period expires later.

Any person who consents to an extension of time for assessment of tax must be presumed to have consented to a similar extension for refund.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 10; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5110; S.L. 1975, ch. 527, § 9; 1981, ch. 583, § 5; 1991, ch. 648, § 10; 1997, ch. 502, § 1; 2001, ch. 549, § 3.

57-51-10.
Proceedings and penalty on delinquency.

When the tax provided for in this chapter becomes delinquent, there is hereby imposed a penalty of five dollars, or a sum equal to five percent of the tax due, whichever is greater, with interest at the rate of one percent per month on the tax due, for each calendar month or fraction thereof during which such delinquency continues, excepting the month within which such tax became due, which must be collected in the manner hereinafter provided. If any person fails to make any report herein required, within the time prescribed by law for such report, it is the duty of the commissioner to examine the books, records, and files of such person to ascertain the amount and value of such production to compute the tax thereon as provided herein, and the commissioner shall add thereto the amount of any penalties accrued thereon. The commissioner, for good cause shown, may waive the penalty or the interest provided by this section.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 10; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5110; S.L. 1975, ch. 527, § 9; 1981, ch. 583, § 5.

57-51-11.
Lien for tax — Preservation of lien — Satisfaction of lien.

The tax, penalty, and interest provided for in this chapter is, at all times, a first and paramount lien against the purchaser’s or producer’s property as the case may be, both real and personal. The provisions of this chapter making the purchaser liable to pay the tax and requiring the producer to pay the royalty owner’s tax do not release the producer or purchaser from that liability. If the tax, penalty, and interest is not paid, it may be recovered at the suit of the state, upon relation to the commissioner, in any court of competent jurisdiction of the county where any such property, assets, and effects are located.

Any judgment creditor, or lien claimant acquiring any interest in, or lien on, any property situated in this state, prior to the commissioner filing in the central indexing system maintained by the secretary of state, a notice of the lien provided for in this section, takes free of, or has priority over, the lien. The commissioner shall index in the central indexing system the following data:

The name of the taxpayer.

The name “State of North Dakota” as claimant.

The date and time the notice of lien was indexed.

The amount of the lien.

The internal revenue service taxpayer identification number or social security number of the taxpayer.

Upon the payment of tax, penalty, and interest, if applicable, or a penalty assessed under section 57-51-06, as to which the commissioner has indexed a notice in the central indexing system, the commissioner shall index a satisfaction of the lien in the central indexing system.

The commissioner is exempt from the payment of the fees otherwise provided for by law for the indexing of the lien or satisfaction.

The notice of lien is effective as of eight a.m. of the first day following the indexing of the notice. A notice of lien filed by the commissioner before August 1, 1997, may be indexed in the central indexing system without changing its original priority as to property in the county where the lien was filed.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 11; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5111; S.L. 1997, ch. 503, § 1; 1999, ch. 313, § 13; 2001, ch. 120, § 1; 2011, ch. 456, § 14; 2013, ch. 257, § 45; 2015, ch. 372, § 1.

57-51-12.
Delinquent taxes — Sale of property.

When any tax provided for in this chapter becomes delinquent, the commissioner shall issue warrants directed to the sheriff of any county wherein the same, or any part thereof accrued, for the collection of said tax, interest, and penalty; and the sheriff to whom said warrant is directed, shall proceed to levy upon the property, assets, and effects of the person liable for such tax, and shall sell the same and make return thereof, as upon execution. The state of North Dakota, through the commissioner, is authorized to make bids at any such sale to the amount of tax, penalty, and costs accrued.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 12; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5112.

57-51-13.
False report deemed perjury. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

57-51-14.
Duties of commissioner and state treasurer.

It is the duty of the commissioner to deposit with the state treasurer all moneys collected by the commissioner under this chapter and to accompany each remittance, when possible, with a certificate showing the county where produced. The state treasurer, no less than quarterly, shall pay over to the county treasurers and city auditors of the several counties the moneys to which they are entitled hereunder. For purposes of distributions and allocations made by the state treasurer under this chapter and chapters 57-51.1 and 57-51.2, all revenue collected by the commissioner under this chapter must be considered revenue collections for the period in which the revenue was received by the commissioner.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 339, § 14; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-5114; S.L. 1989, ch. 650, § 2; 2015, ch. 464, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.